Washington statutes.
RCW 43.82.130

Powers and duties of director.

The director of the department of enterprise services is authorized to do all acts and things necessary or convenient to carry out the powers and duties expressly provided in this chapter.

[ 2015 c 225 s 77; 1965 c 8 s 43.82.130. Prior: 1959 c 255 s 13.]

NOTES: